Hawaii statutes.
[§323B-2] Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Breach" has the same meaning as in
45 Code of Federal Regulations section 164.402, as may be amended.

"Business associate" has the same
meaning as in 45 Code of Federal Regulations section 160.103, as may be
amended.

"Covered entity" has the same meaning
as in 45 Code of Federal Regulations section 160.103, as may be amended.

"Disclosure" has the same meaning as
in 45 Code of Federal Regulations section 160.103, as may be amended.

"Health information" has the same
meaning as in 45 Code of Federal Regulations section 160.103, as may be
amended.

"Individually identifiable health
information" has the same meaning as in 45 Code of Federal Regulations
section 160.103, as may be amended.

"Unsecured protected health
information" has the same meaning as in 45 Code of Federal Regulations
section 164.402, as may be amended.

"Use" has the same meaning as in 45
Code of Federal Regulations section 160.103, as may be amended. [L 2012, c 315,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next